Hawaii statutes.
§665-5 Claim to proceeds. Any person
claiming the proceeds of sale of escheated property may present the person's
claim by commencing an action in the circuit court of the first circuit.
Service shall be made upon the attorney general who may appear and defend on
behalf of the State. If the court renders a judgment in favor of the
plaintiff, the director of finance shall pay the proceeds to the plaintiff,
with interest as allowed by the court, not to exceed six per cent a year. [L
1886, c 8, §5; RL 1925, §2917; RL 1935, §4234; RL 1945, §10245; RL 1955,
§235-5; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §665-5; am L 1972,
c 90, §7(b); gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next